Utah statutes.
61-2e-103.   Rulemaking.
In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
the board may make rules that are:
(1)  consistent with this chapter; and
(2)  necessary to implement this chapter.
